District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.15

Community property and tenancy by the entireties.

(a)

A deposit of community property in an account does not alter the community character of the property or community rights in the property, but a right of survivorship between parties married to or domestic partners of each other arising from the express terms of the account or section 19-602.12 may not be altered by will.

(b)

This subchapter does not affect the law governing tenancy by the entireties.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 5(s), 53 DCR 1035

History

D.C. Law 16-79, in subsec. (a), substituted “married to or domestic partners of each other” for “married to each other”.

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 216 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).

Editor's Notes